Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1916
Polygraph; license to operate; applicant; qualifications; affidavit; contents.

(1) Each applicant for a truth and deception examiner's license to operate a polygraph instrument shall submit to the Secretary of State a sworn affidavit that the applicant:

(a) Is at least nineteen years of age;

(b) Is a citizen of the United States and a resident of the State of Nebraska;

(c) Has not been under sentence for the commission of a felony within five years prior to such application, including parole, probation, or actual incarceration, and has never been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude;

(d) Has an academic degree at the baccalaureate level from an accredited college or university, has at least four years of investigative experience at the federal, state, political subdivision, or private licensed investigator level immediately prior to application, or has had at least four years experience administering polygraph examinations;

(e) Has satisfactorily completed a minimum of two hundred fifty classroom hours of formal polygraph instructions from an institution recognized and approved by the secretary and satisfactorily completed not less than one year of internship training or its equivalent as approved by the secretary; and

(f) Has not previously had an examiner's license or its equivalent refused, revoked, or suspended, or otherwise invalidated for any cause which would also represent lawful grounds for revoking or denying the applicant's license under sections 81-1901 to 81-1936.

(2) Each applicant shall also:

(a) Furnish the secretary with satisfactory proof that he or she has had suitable experience in the personal administration of polygraph examinations during his or her internship or its equivalent;

(b) Furnish the secretary with completed fingerprint cards, in duplicate, bearing the applicant's fingerprints and such other identifying information or certification as to the authenticity thereof as the secretary may reasonably require; and

(c) After satisfying all of the other requirements of this section, be required to satisfactorily pass a written examination regarding the polygraph, conducted by the secretary or under his or her supervision, given to determine competency to practice as an examiner.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 16.